sv: Lämplig för materialtyp: Akryl; Aluminium; Mässing; Tegel; Brons; Kartong; Cement; Keramisk; Betong; Koppar; Emalj; Epoxi; Fiberskiva; Glasfiber; Flinta; Glas; Granit; Murbruk; Hardboard; Järn; Läder; Kalksten; Linne; Marmor; Metall; Murbruk; Nylon; Papper; Plåster; Plast; Plywood; Porslin; Gummi; Sandsten; Stål; Sten; Stuck; Trä; Annat
hr-HR: Vrsta materijala za koji je prikladno: Akril; Aluminij; Mjed; Cigla; Bronca; Karton; Cement; Keramika; Beton; Bakar; Emajl; Epoksi smola; Vlaknasta ploča; Stakloplastika; Kvarc; Staklo; Granit; Mort za injektiranje; Iverica; Željezo; Koža; Vapnenac; Lan; Mramor; Metal; Mort; Najlon; Papir; Gips; Plastika; Šperploča; Porculan; Guma; Pješčenjak; Čelik; Kamen; Štuko; Drvo; Ostalo
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de material: Acrílico; Alumínio; Latão; Tijolo; Bronze; Cartão; Cimento; Cerâmica; Betão; Cobre; Esmalte; Epóxi; Painel de fibra; Fibra de vidro; Pedra; Vidro; Granito; Reboco; Madeira compensada; Ferro; Pele; Calcário; Linho; Mármore; Metal; Argamassa; Náilon; Papel; Gesso; Plástico; Contraplacado; Porcelana; Borracha; Arenito; Aço; Pedra; Estuque; Madeira; Outro
ja: 素材タイプに適している: アクリル; アルミニウム; 真鍮; レンガ; ブロンズ; 段ボール; セメント; セラミック; コンクリート; コッパー; エナメル; エポキシ; 繊維板; ガラス繊維; フリント; ガラス; 花崗岩; グラウト; ハードボード; 鉄; レザー; 石灰岩; リネン; 大理石; 金属; モルタル; ナイロン; 紙; 石膏; プラスチック; 合板; 磁器; ゴム; 砂岩; スチール; 石; 漆喰; 木材; その他
da: Velegnet til materialetype: Akryl; Aluminum; Messing; Mursten; Bronze; Pap; Cement; Keramik; Beton; Kobber; Emalje; Epoxy; Fiberplade; Glasfiber; Flint; Glas; Granit; Cementmørtel; Hardboard; Jern; Læder; Kalksten; Linned; Marmor; Metal; Mørtel; Nylon; Papir; Gips; Plast; Krydsfiner; Porcelæn; Gummi; Sandsten; Stål; Sten; Stucco; Træ; Andet
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de material: Acrilic; Aluminiu; Alamă; Cărămidă; Bronz; Carton; Ciment; Ceramic; Beton; Cupru; Email; Epoxid; Placi de fibre; Fibră de sticlă; Cremene; Sticlă; Granit; Lapte de ciment; Placă dură; Fier; Piele; Calcar; In; Marmură; Metal; Mortar; Nailon; Hârtie; Tencuială; Plastic; Placaj; Porțelan; Cauciuc; Gresie; Oțel; Piatră; Stuc; Lemn; Altele
ko: 적합한 재료 유형: 아크릴; 알루미늄; 황동; 벽돌; 청동색; 판지; 시멘트; 세라믹; 콘크리트; 구리; 에나멜; 에폭시; 섬유판; 유리 섬유; 부싯돌; 유리; 화강암; 그라우트; 하드보드; 철; 가죽; 석회암; 린넨; 대리석; 금속; 모르타르; 나일론; 종이; 석고; 플라스틱; 합판; 도기; 고무; 사암; 강철; 석재; 스투코; 목재; 기타
nl: Geschikt voor materiaaltype: Acryl; Aluminium; Messing; Baksteen; Brons; Karton; Cement; Keramiek; Beton; Koper; Email; Epoxy; Vezelplaat; Glasvezel; Vuursteen; Glas; Graniet; Voegspecie; Hardboard; IJzer; Leer; Kalksteen; Linnen; Marmer; Metaal; Mortel; Nylon; Papier; Gips; Plastic; Multiplex; Porselein; Rubber; Zandsteen; Staal; Steen; Stucco; Hout; Andere
ru: Для какого типа материала: Акрил; Алюминий; Латунь; Кирпич; Бронза; Картон; Цемент; Керамика; Бетон; Медь; Эмаль; Эпоксидная смола; ДВП; Стекловолокно; Кремень; Стеклянные; Гранит; Жидкий строительный раствор; ДВП; Железо; Кожа; Известняк; Лен; Мрамор; Металл; Раствор; Нейлон; Бумага; Штукатурка; Пластик; Фанера; Фарфор; Резина; Песчаник; Сталь; Камень; Штукатурка; Дерево; Другое
bg-BG: Подходящ за вид материал: Акрил; Алуминий; Месинг; Тухла; Бронз; Картон; Цимент; Керамика; Бетон; Мед; Емайл; Епоксидна смола; Фазер; Fiberglass; Кремък; Стъкло; Гранит; Фугиращ разтвор; Твърд картон; Желязо; Кожа; Варовик; Лен; Мрамор; Метал; Хоросан; Найлон; Хартия; Гипс; Пластмаса; Шперплат; Порцелан; Каучук; Пясъчник; Стомана; Камък; Mазилка; Дърво; Други
cs: Vhodný typ materiálu: Akrylové; Hliník; Mosaz; Cihla; Bronzová; Lepenka; Cement; Keramika; Beton; Měděná; Email; Epoxid; Dřevovláknitá deska; Skelná vata; Křesací kámen; Sklo; Žula; Spárovací hmoty; Sololit; Železo; Kůže; Vápenec; Len; Mramor; Kov; Malta; Nylon; Papír; Omítka; Plast; Překližka; Porcelán; Guma; Pískovec; Ocel; Kámen; Štuk; Dřevo; Jiné
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto materiala: Akril; Aluminij; Medenina; Opeka; Bron; Karton; Cement; Keramika; Beton; Baker; Emajl; Epoksi; Vlaknene plošče; Steklena vlakna; Kremen; Steklo; Granit; Fugirna masa; Lesonitna plošča; Železo; Usnje; Apnenec; Lan; Marmor; Kovina; Malta; Najlon; Papir; Mavec; Plastika; Vezane plošče; Porcelan; Guma; Peščenjak; Jeklo; Kamen; Stucco; Les; Drugo
es: Adecuado para tipo de material: Acrílico; Aluminio; Latón; Ladrillo; Bronce; Cartón; Cemento; Cerámica; Hormigón; Cobre; Esmalte; Epoxi; Tablero de fibras; Fibra de vidrio; Pedernal; Vidrio; Granito; Mezcla para juntas; Tablero duro; Hierro; Cuero; Piedra caliza; Lino; Mármol; Metal; Mortero; Nylon; Papel; Yeso; Plástico; Madera contrachapada; Porcelana; Goma; Piedra arenisca; Acero; Piedra; Estuco; Madera; Otros
tr: Malzeme Tipine Uygun: Akrilik; Alüminyum; Pirinç; Tuğla; Bronz; Kalın karton; Çimento; Seramik; Beton; Bakır; Emaye; Epoksi; Lif levha; Fiberglas; Çakmaktaşı; Cam; Granit; Derz; Sunta; Demir; Deri; Kireçtaşı; Keten; Mermer; Metal; Harç; Plastik; Kağıt; Alçı; Plastik; Kontrplak; Porselen; Kauçuk; Kumtaşı; Çelik; Taş; Sıva; Ahşap; Diğer
zh-CN: 适用材料类型: 丙烯酸; 铝; 黄铜; 砖; 青铜色; 纸板; 水泥; 陶瓷制品; 混凝土; 铜色; 搪瓷; 环氧树脂; 纤维板; 玻璃纤维; 燧石; 玻璃; 花岗岩; 灌浆; 硬板; 铁; 皮革; 石灰石; 亚麻; 大理石; 金属; 砂浆; 尼龙; 纸张; 石膏; 塑料; 胶合板; 瓷器; 橡胶; 砂岩; 钢; 石头; 灰泥; 木头; 其他
zh-TW: 適用材質類型: 壓克力; 鋁; 黃銅; 磚; 銅色; 紙板; 水泥; 陶瓷; 實心; 紅銅色; 琺瑯; 環氧樹脂; 纖維板; 玻璃纖維; 燧石; 玻璃; 花崗岩; 水泥漿; 硬質纖維板; 鐵; 皮製; 石灰岩; 亞麻; 大理石; 金屬; 砂漿; 尼龍; 紙; 石膏; 塑膠; 合板; 陶瓷; 橡膠; 砂岩; 鋼; 石頭; 灰泥; 木材; 其他
it: Tipo di materiale ideale: Acrilico; Alluminio; Ottone; Mattone; Bronzo; Cartone; Cemento; Ceramica; Calcestruzzo; Rame; Smalto; Resina epossidica; Fibra di legno; Vetroresina; Pietra focaia; Vetro; Granito; Malta; Pannello rigido; Ferro; Pelle; Pietra calcarea; Lino; Marmo; Metallo; Malta per mattoni; Nylon; Carta; Malta; Plastica; Compensato; Porcellana; Gomma; Arenaria; Acciaio; Pietra; Stucco; Legno; Altro
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο υλικού: Ακρυλικό; Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Τούβλο; Ορείχαλκος; Χαρτόνι; Τσιμέντο; Κεραμικό; Σκυρόδεμα; Χαλκός; Σμάλτο; Εποξειδική; Σκληρό υλικό από πεπιεσμένες ίνες; Υαλοβάμβακας; Πυρόλιθος; Γυαλί; Γρανίτης; Ρευστοκονίαμα; Χαρτοσανίδα; Σίδερο; Δερμάτινο; Ασβεστόλιθος; Λινό; Μάρμαρο; Μέταλλο; Κονίαμα; Νάιλον; Χαρτί; Γύψος; Πλαστικό; Κόντρα πλακέ; Πορσελάνη; Καουτσούκ; Ψαμμίτης; Χάλυβας; Πέτρα; Στόκος; Ξύλο; Άλλο
nb: Egnet for materialtype: Akryl; Aluminium; Messing; Murstein; Bronse; Papp; Sement; Keramikk; Betong; Kobber; Emalje; Epoksy; Trefiberplate; Glassfiber; Flint; Glass; Granitt; Fugemasse; Hardboard; Jern; Skinn; Kalkstein; Lin; Marmor; Metall; Mørtel; Nylon; Papir; Gips; Plast; Kryssfiner; Porselen; Gummi; Sandstein; Stål; Stein; Stukkatur; Trevirke; Annen
pl: Typ odpowiedni dla materiału: Akryl; Aluminium; Mosiądz; Cegła; Brąz; Tektura; Cement; Ceramika; Beton; Miedź; Emalia; Epoksyd.; Płyta pilśniowa; Włókno szklane; Flint; Szkło; Granit; Zaczyn cementowy; Twarda płyta pilśniowa; Żelazo; Skórzane; Wapień; Bielizna pościelowa; Marmur; Metal; Moździerz; Nylon; Papier; Tynk; Tworzywo sztuczne; Sklejka; Porcelana; Guma; Piaskowiec; Stal; Kamień; Sztukateria; Drewno; Pozostałe
fi: Soveltuu materiaalityyppiin: Akryyli; Alumiini; Messinki; Tiili; Pronssi; Pahvi; Sementti; Keraaminen; Betoni; Kupari; Emali; Epoksi; Kuitulevy; Lasikuitu; Pii; Lasi; Graniitti; Saumauslaasti; Kovalevy; Rauta; Nahka; Kalkkikivi; Pellava; Marmori; Metalli; Laasti; Nailon; Paperi; Kipsi; Muovi; Vaneri; Posliini; Kumi; Hiekkakivi; Teräs; Kivi; Stucco; Puu; Muu
th: เหมาะสำหรับประเภทวัสดุ: อะคริลิก; อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; อิฐ; สีบรอนซ์; กระดาษลัง; ซีเมนต์; เซรามิก; คอนกรีต; สีทองแดง; สีสูตรอีนาเมล; อีพ็อกซี่; ไฟเบอร์บอร์ด; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; หินไฟ; แก้ว; หินแกรนิต; ยาแนว; ฮาร์ดบอร์ด; เหล็ก; หนัง; หินปูน; ผ้าลินิน; หินอ่อน; โลหะ; มอร์ตาร์; ไนลอน; กระดาษ; พลาสเตอร์; พลาสติก; แผ่นไม้อัด; พอร์ซเลน; ยาง; หินทราย; เหล็ก; หิน; ปูนฉาบ; ไม้; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de material: Acrílico; Alumínio; Latão; Tijolo; Bronze; Cartão; Cimento; Cerâmica; Concreto; Cobre; Esmalte; Epóxi; Painel de fibra; Fibra de vidro; Pedra; Vidro; Granito; Argamassa; Cartão duro; Ferro; Couro; Calcário; Linho; Mármore; Metal; Argamassa; Nylon; Papel; Gesso; Plástico; Madeira compensada; Porcelana; Borracha; Arenito; Aço; Pedra; Reboco; Madeira; Outro
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ materiálu: Akryl; Hliník; Mosadz; Tehla; Bronzový; Kartón; Cement; Keramika; Betón; Meď; Smalt; Epoxid; Drevovláknitá doska; Sklolaminát; Kremenný; Sklo; Žula; Škárovacia hmota; Lisovaná doska; Železo; Koža; Vápenec; Ľan; Mramor; Kov; Malta; Nylon; Papier; Omietka; Plast; Preglejka; Porcelán; Guma; Pieskovec; Oceľ; Kameň; Stucco; Drevo; Iné
lt-LT: Tinka medžiagos tipui: Akrilas; Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Plytos; Bronza; Kartonas; Cementas; Keramika; Betonas; Varis; Emalis; Epoksidas; Medienos plaušų plokštė; Stiklo pluoštas; Titnagas; Stiklas; Granitas; Glaistymo skiedinys; Medienos plaušų plokštė; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); Oda; Kalkakmenis; Lininis audinys; Marmuras; Metalas; Skiedinys; Nailonas; Popierius; Gipsas; Plastikas; Fanera; Porcelianas; Kaučiukas; Smiltainis; Plienas; Akmuo; Tinkavimo gipsas; Mediena; Kita
vi: Phù hợp với loại vật liệu: Acrylic; Nhôm; Đồng; Gạch; Màu đồng; Bìa cứng; Xi măng; Gốm; Bê tông; Màu đồng đỏ; Men; Epoxi; Ván sợi; Sợi thủy tinh; Đá lửa; Thủy tinh; Đá granit; Vữa xi măng; Tấm ép cứng; Sắt; Da; Đá vôi; Lanh; Cẩm thạch; Kim loại; Vữa; Nylon; Giấy; Thạch cao; Nhựa; Gỗ ép; Sứ; Cao su; Đá sa thạch; Thép; Đá; Vữa trát ngoài; Gỗ; Khác
de: Geeignet für diesen Materialtyp: Acryl; Aluminium; Messing; Ziegel; Bronze; Karton; Zement; Keramik; Beton; Kupfer; Emaillelack; Epoxid; Faserplatte; Fiberglas; Feuerstein; Glas; Granit; Mörtel; Hartfaserplatte; Eisen; Leder; Kalkstein; Leinen; Marmor; Metall; Mörtel; Nylon; Papier; Pflaster; Kunststoff; Sperrholz; Porzellan; Gummi; Sandstein; Stahl; Stein; Stuck; Holz; Sonstiges
en: Suitable for material type: Acrylic; Aluminum; Brass; Brick; Bronze; Cardboard; Cement; Ceramic; Concrete; Copper; Enamel; Epoxy; Fiberboard; Fiberglass; Flint; Glass; Granite; Grout; Hardboard; Iron; Leather; Limestone; Linen; Marble; Metal; Mortar; Nylon; Paper; Plaster; Plastic; Plywood; Porcelain; Rubber; Sandstone; Steel; Stone; Stucco; Wood; Other
hu: Anyagtípus: Akril; Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Tégla; Bronz; Kartonpapír; Cement; Kerámia; Beton; Réz; Zománc; Epoxi; Rostlemez; Üveggyapot; Kovakő; Üveg; Gránit; Fuga; Keménylemez; Vas; Bőr; Mészkő; Lenvászon; Márvány; Fém; Habarcs; Nejlon; Papír; Vakolat; Műanyag; Rétegelt lemez; Porcelán; Gumi; Homokkő; Acél; Kő; Stukkó; Fa; Egyéb
fr: Convient au type de matériau: Acrylique; Aluminum; Laiton; Brique; Bronze; Papier carton; Ciment; Céramique; Béton; Cuivre; Vernis; Époxy; Panneaux de fibres de bois; Fibre de verre; Silex; Verre; Granit; Jointoyer; Panneaux durs; Fer; Cuir; Calcaire; Lin; Marbre; Métal; Mortier; Nylon; Papier; Plâtre; Plastique; Contre-plaqué; Porcelaine; Caoutchouc; Grès; Acier; Pierre; Stucco; Bois; Autre